District of Columbia statutes.
50-1703.01

Child Passenger Safety Program.

Any fines in excess of $55 shall be directed to fund the Child Passenger Safety Program which will be used:

(1)

To assure that at least one fitting station is located in each ward of the city at the facilities of the District of Columbia Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department (“DCFEMS”), Metropolitan Police Department (“MPD”) precincts, Department of Motor Vehicle (“DMV”) Inspection Stations or facilities of the Department of Transportation (“DOT”);

(2)

That personnel of the DCFEMS, MPD, DMV and DOT receive training on the proper installation of a child restraint system;

(3)

To provide offenders with a child passenger safety class administered by DOT; and

(4)

To provide children of all ages who are from low income families with child restraint systems free or at a minimal cost.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-194, § 4a
as added Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-212, § 2(b), 49 DCR 8137